Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3521
Board; expenses; reimbursement.

Each member of the board shall serve without compensation and, pursuant to sections 81-1174 to 81-1177, shall be reimbursed for:

(1) Each day actually spent in traveling to and from and while attending sessions of the board and its committees or authorized meetings of the National Association of State Boards of Geology, or its subdivisions or committees; and

(2) Expenses incident to the performance of duties under the Geologists Regulation Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 69;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 129;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 18.